Utah statutes.
38-11-108.   Notification of rights under chapter.
(1)  Beginning July 1, 1995, the original contractor or real estate developer
shall state in the written contract with the owner what actions are necessary
for the owner to be protected under Section 38-11-107 from the maintaining of
a mechanic's lien or other civil action against the owner or the owner-
occupied residence to recover monies owed for qualified services.
(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the division may issue rules providing for the form and content of the
information required by Subsection (1).
